lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 17311 tė čiusioji . 1544
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosios . 1545
SFX 17311 tė čiusiajai . 1546
SFX 17311 tė čiusiąją . 1547
SFX 17311 tė čiusiąja . 1548
SFX 17311 tė čiusiojoje . 1549
SFX 17311 tė čiusiojoj . 1550
SFX 17311 tė čiusioji . 1551
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosios . 1552
SFX 17311 tė čiusiųjų . 1553
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosioms . 1554
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosiom . 1555
SFX 17311 tė čiusiąsias . 1556
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosiomis . 1557
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosiom . 1558
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosiose . 1559
SFX 17311 tė čiusiosios . 1560
SFX 17311 o ęs . 1486
SFX 17311 o usis . 1487
SFX 17311 o usio . 1488
SFX 17311 o usiam . 1489
SFX 17311 o usį . 1490
SFX 17311 o usiu . 1491
SFX 17311 o usiame . 1492
SFX 17311 o usiam . 1493
SFX 17311 o ęs . 1494
SFX 17311 o usis . 1495
SFX 17311 o ę . 1496
SFX 17311 o ę . 1497
SFX 17311 o usys . 1498
SFX 17311 o usių . 1499
SFX 17311 o usiems . 1500
SFX 17311 o usiem . 1501
SFX 17311 o usius . 1502
SFX 17311 o usiais . 1503
SFX 17311 o usiuose . 1504
SFX 17311 o usiuos . 1505
SFX 17311 o ę . 1506
SFX 17311 o usys . 1507
SFX 17311 o usi . 1508
SFX 17311 o usios . 1509
SFX 17311 o usiai . 1510
SFX 17311 o usią . 1511
SFX 17311 o usia . 1512
SFX 17311 o usioje . 1513
SFX 17311 o usioj . 1514
SFX 17311 o usi . 1515
SFX 17311 o usios . 1516
SFX 17311 o ę . 1516
SFX 17311 o usių . 1517
SFX 17311 o usioms . 1518
SFX 17311 o usiom . 1519
SFX 17311 o usias . 1520
SFX 17311 o usiomis . 1521
SFX 17311 o usiom . 1522
SFX 17311 o usiose . 1523
SFX 17311 o usios . 1524
SFX 17311 o ę . 1524
SFX 17311 o usysis . 1525
SFX 17311 o usysai . 1526
SFX 17311 o usiojo . 1527
SFX 17311 o usiajam . 1528
SFX 17311 o usįjį . 1529
SFX 17311 o usiuoju . 1530
SFX 17311 o usiajame . 1531
SFX 17311 o usiajam . 1532
SFX 17311 o usysis . 1533
SFX 17311 o usysai . 1534
SFX 17311 o usieji . 1535
SFX 17311 o usiųjų . 1536
SFX 17311 o usiesiems . 1537
SFX 17311 o usiesiem . 1538
SFX 17311 o usiuosius . 1539
SFX 17311 o usiaisiais . 1540
SFX 17311 o usiuosiuose . 1541
SFX 17311 o usiuosiuos . 1542
SFX 17311 o usieji . 1543
SFX 17311 o usioji . 1544
SFX 17311 o usiosios . 1545
SFX 17311 o usiajai . 1546
SFX 17311 o usiąją . 1547
SFX 17311 o usiąja . 1548
SFX 17311 o usiojoje . 1549
SFX 17311 o usiojoj . 1550
SFX 17311 o usioji . 1551
SFX 17311 o usiosios . 1552
SFX 17311 o usiųjų . 1553
SFX 17311 o usiosioms . 1554
SFX 17311 o usiosiom . 1555
SFX 17311 o usiąsias . 1556
SFX 17311 o usiosiomis . 1557
SFX 17311 o usiosiom . 1558
SFX 17311 o usiosiose . 1559
SFX 17311 o usiosios . 1560
SFX 17311 ėsi ęsis . 1486
SFX 17311 osi ęsis . 1486
SFX 17311 ėsi ęsi . 1496
SFX 17311 osi ęsi . 1496
SFX 17311 ėsi iusis [^dt]ėsi 1508
SFX 17311 dėsi džiusis . 1508
SFX 17311 tėsi čiusis . 1508
SFX 17311 osi usis . 1508
SFX 17311 ėsi iusiosi [^dt]ėsi 1516
SFX 17311 dėsi džiusiosi . 1516
SFX 17311 tėsi čiusiosi . 1516
SFX 17311 osi usiosi . 1516
SFX 17311 ė ius [^dt]ė 1561
SFX 17311 dė džius . 1561
SFX 17311 tė čius . 1561
SFX 17311 o us . 1561

SFX 17384 Y 32
SFX 17384 ė iusian [^dt]ė 1562
SFX 17384 ė iusiuosna [^dt]ė 1563
SFX 17384 ė iusion [^dt]ė 1564
SFX 17384 ė iusiosna [^dt]ė 1565
SFX 17384 ė iusiajan [^dt]ė 1566
SFX 17384 ė iusiuosiuosna [^dt]ė 1567
SFX 17384 ė iusiojon [^dt]ė 1568
SFX 17384 ė iusiosiosna [^dt]ė 1569
SFX 17384 dė džiusian . 1562
SFX 17384 dė džiusiuosna . 1563
SFX 17384 dė džiusion . 1564
SFX 17384 dė džiusiosna . 1565
SFX 17384 dė džiusiajan . 1566
SFX 17384 dė džiusiuosiuosna . 1567
SFX 17384 dė džiusiojon . 1568
SFX 17384 dė džiusiosiosna . 1569
SFX 17384 tė čiusian . 1562
SFX 17384 tė čiusiuosna . 1563
SFX 17384 tė čiusion . 1564
SFX 17384 tė čiusiosna . 1565
SFX 17384 tė čiusiajan . 1566
SFX 17384 tė čiusiuosiuosna . 1567
SFX 17384 tė čiusiojon . 1568
SFX 17384 tė čiusiosiosna . 1569
SFX 17384 o usian . 1562
SFX 17384 o usiuosna . 1563
SFX 17384 o usion . 1564
SFX 17384 o usiosna . 1565
SFX 17384 o usiajan . 1566
SFX 17384 o usiuosiuosna . 1567
SFX 17384 o usiojon . 1568
SFX 17384 o usiosiosna . 1569

SFX 17385 Y 16
SFX 17385 ė iusiu [^dt]ė 1570
SFX 17385 ė iusi [^dt]ė 1571
SFX 17385 ė iusiuoju [^dt]ė 1572
SFX 17385 ė iusioji [^dt]ė 1573
SFX 17385 dė džiusiu . 1570
SFX 17385 dė džiusi . 1571
SFX 17385 dė džiusiuoju . 1572
SFX 17385 dė džiusioji . 1573
SFX 17385 tė čiusiu . 1570
SFX 17385 tė čiusi . 1571
SFX 17385 tė čiusiuoju . 1572
SFX 17385 tė čiusioji . 1573
SFX 17385 o usiu . 1570
SFX 17385 o usi . 1571
SFX 17385 o usiuoju . 1572
SFX 17385 o usioji . 1573

SFX 17744 Y 10
SFX 17744 o o . 1469
SFX 17744 ė ė . 1469
SFX 17744 o o . 1474
SFX 17744 ė ė . 1474
SFX 17744 o o . 1475
SFX 17744 ė ė . 1475
SFX 17744 o ę . 1497
SFX 17744 ė ę . 1497
SFX 17744 o us . 1561
SFX 17744 ė us . 1561

SFX 17754 Y 21
SFX 17754 ai ai . 1574
SFX 17754 ai iau [^dijt]ai 118
SFX 17754 dai džiau . 118
SFX 17754 iai iau . 118
SFX 17754 jai jau . 118
SFX 17754 tai čiau . 118
SFX 17754 ai iausiai [^dijt]ai 123
SFX 17754 dai džiausiai . 123
SFX 17754 iai iausiai . 123
SFX 17754 jai jausiai . 123
SFX 17754 tai čiausiai . 123
SFX 17754 ai iausia [^dijt]ai 1575
SFX 17754 dai džiausia . 1575
SFX 17754 iai iausia . 1575
SFX 17754 jai jausia . 1575
SFX 17754 tai čiausia . 1575
SFX 17754 ai yn [^i]ai 145
SFX 17754 iai yn [^čž]iai 145
SFX 17754 čiai tyn . 145
SFX 17754 žiai žyn [^d]žiai 145
SFX 17754 džiai dyn . 145

SFX 17760 Y 5
SFX 17760 ai ėliau [^i]ai 121
SFX 17760 čiai tėliau . 121
SFX 17760 džiai dėliau . 121
SFX 17760 iai ėliau [^žč]iai 121
SFX 17760 žiai žėliau [^d]žiai 121

SFX 17780 Y 8
SFX 17780 i i . 1574
SFX 17780 i iau [^t]i 118
SFX 17780 ti čiau . 118
SFX 17780 i iausiai [^t]i 123
SFX 17780 ti čiausiai . 123
SFX 17780 i iausia [^t]i 1575
SFX 17780 ti čiausia . 1575
SFX 17780 i yn . 145

SFX 17783 Y 1
SFX 17783 i ėliau . 121

SFX 17789 Y 6
SFX 17789 g g . 1574
SFX 17789 0 el . 1576
SFX 17789 0 iau . 118
SFX 17789 0 iausiai . 123
SFX 17789 0 iausia . 1577
SFX 17789 0 yn . 145

SFX 17792 Y 1
SFX 17792 0 ėliau . 121

SFX 17796 Y 5
SFX 17796 a a [^it]a 1574
SFX 17796 a iau [^it]a 118
SFX 17796 a iausiai [^it]a 123
SFX 17796 a iausia [^it]a 1577
SFX 17796 a yn [^it]a 145

SFX 17798 Y 1
SFX 17798 a ėliau [^it]a 121

SFX 17802 Y 28
SFX 17802 ui ui [^dij]ui 1574
SFX 17802 ui iau [^dij]ui 118
SFX 17802 ui iausiai [^dij]ui 123
SFX 17802 ui iausia [^dij]ui 1575
SFX 17802 iui iui [^čž]iui 1574
SFX 17802 iui iau [^čž]iui 118
SFX 17802 iui iausiai [^čž]iui 123
SFX 17802 iui iausia [^čž]iui 1575
SFX 17802 čiui čiui . 1574
SFX 17802 čiui čiau . 118
SFX 17802 čiui čiausiai . 123
SFX 17802 čiui čiausia . 1575
SFX 17802 žiui žiui [^d]žiui 1574
SFX 17802 žiui žiau [^d]žiui 118
SFX 17802 žiui žiausiai [^d]žiui 123
SFX 17802 žiui žiausia [^d]žiui 1575
SFX 17802 džiui džiui . 1574
SFX 17802 džiui džiau . 118
SFX 17802 džiui džiausiai . 123
SFX 17802 džiui džiausia . 1575
SFX 17802 dui dui . 1574
SFX 17802 dui džiau . 118
SFX 17802 dui džiausiai . 123
SFX 17802 dui džiausia . 1575
SFX 17802 jui jui . 1574
SFX 17802 jui jau . 118
SFX 17802 jui jausiai . 123
SFX 17802 jui jausia . 1575

SFX 17804 Y 7
SFX 17804 ui ėliau [^dij]ui 121
SFX 17804 iui ėliau [^čž]iui 121
SFX 17804 čiui tėliau . 121
SFX 17804 žiui žėliau [^d]žiui 121
SFX 17804 džiui dėliau . 121
SFX 17804 dui dėliau . 121
SFX 17804 jui jėliau . 121

SFX 17837 Y 8
SFX 17837 iau iau [^č]iau 118
SFX 17837 iau iausiai [^č]iau 123
SFX 17837 iau iausia [^č]iau 1575
SFX 17837 iau yn [^č]iau 145
SFX 17837 čiau čiau . 118
SFX 17837 čiau čiausiai . 123
SFX 17837 čiau čiausia . 1575
SFX 17837 čiau tyn . 145

SFX 17838 Y 2
SFX 17838 iau ėliau [^č]iau 121
SFX 17838 čiau tėliau . 121

SFX 17847 Y 5
SFX 17847 a a . 1574
SFX 17847 a omis . 1574
SFX 17847 a om . 199
SFX 17847 omis omis . 1574
SFX 17847 omis om . 199

AF 17754,9999 # 22
AF 17754,17760,9999 # 69
AF 17847,9999 # 79
AF 17780,17783,9999 # 98
AF 17837,9999 # 107
AF 17789,17792,9999 # 256
AF 17837,17838,9999 # 258
AF 17780,9999 # 323
AF 17789,9999 # 334
AF 17802,9999 # 357
AF 17802,17804,9999 # 360
AF 17796,17798,9999 # 367
