lt-LT.dic
anksti/98	10
apačiau/107	10
apsukomis/79	10
apčiuopomis/79	10
arogantiškai/22	10
arti/98	10
artimai/69	10
atatupstomis/79	10
atokiai/69	10
atvirai/69	10
atžagariomis/79	10
aštriai/69	10
basomis/79	10
bjauriai/22	10
brangiai/69	10
bėgčia/79	10
daug/256	10
dešiniau/258	10
didžiai/69	10
dorai/22	10
drąsiai/69	10
europietiškai/22	10
gausiai/69	10
giliai/69	10
graudžiai/22	10
greitai/69	10
greitosiomis/79	10
gudriai/69	10
imčiomis/79	10
intuityviai/69	10
iškalbiai/22	10
juokingai/69	10
kairiau/258	10
kaktomuša/79	10
keliaklupsčiomis/79	10
kerinčiai/22	10
kietai/69	10
klupstomis/79	10
klūpomis/79	10
kniūpsčia/79	10
kurčiai/22	10
kuždomis/79	10
kūlvirsčia/79	10
labai/69	10
lengvai/69	10
linksmai/69	10
lėtai/69	10
mažai/69	10
mechanizuotai/22	10
neabstrakčiai/22	10
neanksti/323	10
nearti/323	10
neatsitiktinai/22	10
nedarniai/22	10
nedaug/334	10
neemocionaliai/22	10
negirdomis/79	10
negramatiškai/22	10
neišmoningai/22	10
nejučia/79	10
neklastingai/22	10
nelinksmai/22	10
nemačiomis/79	10
nemonotoniškai/22	10
nepagirtinai/22	10
nepakniopstomis/79	10
neperiodiškai/22	10
neprivačiai/22	10
nesaikingai/22	10
neslapčia/79	10
nesmulkiai/22	10
nesvetingai/22	10
netoli/323	10
netuščiai/22	10
netuščiomis/79	10
netyčia/79	10
nevisuotinai/22	10
neūmai/22	10
noriai/69	10
pabrėžtinai/22	10
pabėgomis/79	10
pakaitomis/79	10
pakalniui/357	10
pakankamai/69	10
panaromis/79	10
paprastai/69	10
pasiučiau/107	10
paskiau/258	10
paskui/360	10
paslapčia/79	10
patylomis/79	10
pavasariškai/22	10
pavieniui/357	10
pavėjui/357	10
piečiau/107	10
pigiai/69	10
pirma/367	10
pirmiau/258	10
plačiai/69	10
prancūziškai/22	10
priebėgomis/79	10
pėsčiomis/79	10
ramiai/69	10
religiškai/22	10
rimtai/69	10
roplomis/79	10
ryčiau/107	10
saugiai/69	10
seniai/69	10
siaurai/22	10
skersomis/79	10
smagiai/69	10
srauniai/22	10
staigiai/69	10
stačiomis/79	10
taisyklingai/22	10
tamsiai/69	10
tiesiai/69	10
toli/98	10
tvariai/22	10
tvirtai/69	10
tylomis/79	10
užuolanka/79	10
vakariau/107	10
vienprasmiškai/22	10
vėlai/69	10
įdomiai/69	10
įkalniui/357	10
įpiečiau/107	10
įryčiau/107	10
įsauliui/357	10
įvakariau/107	10
įšiauriau/107	10
įžiemiau/107	10
šiauriau/258	10
šnabždomis/79	10
švariai/69	10
žiemiau/107	10
